Massachusetts, session 194th, H1124.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 113B of chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking, in lines 199 and 210, the figure “5” and inserting
in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 3.
SECTION 2. Said section 113B of said chapter 175, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “accidents”, in line 201, the following words:- , provided
that an upward premium adjustment based on the driver’s first at-fault accident shall not exceed
35 per cent of the existing premium.
of 1